North Carolina, session 2025, HB677.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 1 of Chapter 168 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 168-3.1. Open movie captioning.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Movie. – A story or event recorded by a camera as a set of moving images.
(2) Movie theater. – An entity in the business of providing showings of movies to
the general public.
(3) Open captioning. – The written, on-screen display of a movie's dialogue and
non-speech information, including music, the identity of the character who is
speaking, and other sounds and sound effects.
(4) Operating week. – The operating hours of a movie theater beginning on a
Friday and ending the subsequent Thursday.
(5) Peak attendance hours. – The hours between 5:59 P.M. and 11:01 P.M. on
Friday and 10:59 A.M. and 11:01 P.M. on Saturday or Sunday.
(b) Open Captioning Required. – If a movie theater offers more than 10 movie showings
each operating week, at least one-fourth of all scheduled showings of a movie with four or more
scheduled showings during an operating week shall have open captioning. No more than four
open captioning showings of a single movie shall be required in an operating week. At least half
of the scheduled showings described in this subsection shall begin and end within peak
attendance hours; provided, however, if fewer than one in eight showings of a particular movie
is screened during peak attendance hours, the requirements of this subsection shall be satisfied if
all screenings of the particular movie during peak attendance hours have open captioning. The
showing in the same theater of two movies with open captioning that overlap in time on the
screen shall count toward the minimum number of showings required by this section. Nothing in
this section shall be construed as preventing a movie theater from showing more movies with
open captioning than required by this subsection.
(c) Public Notice. – A movie theater subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this
section shall advertise the date and time of movie showings with open captioning in the same
manner that the movie theater advertises all other movie showings. The advertisement shall
clearly indicate which movie showings will include open captioning.
*H677-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Records. – Every movie theater subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this
section shall maintain documents sufficient to demonstrate their compliance with the open
captioning requirement for a period of at least three years.
(e) Exceptions. – The provisions of this section shall not apply to a movie that is produced
and distributed without open captioning.
(f) Violations. – Any movie theater found to be in violation of the provisions of this
section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and not
more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each violation."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to movies
showing on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 677-First Edition